Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201818-3103
Municipality; action to be appointed custodian.

In the event a homeowners association is dissolved pursuant to section 21-19,138 and not reinstated pursuant to the Nebraska Nonprofit Corporation Act, any municipality may bring an action to be appointed as custodian to manage the affairs of the homeowners association as set forth in section 18-3104.

Laws 2015, LB304, § 3.

Nebraska Nonprofit Corporation Act, see section 21-1901.